Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
506

MORTGAGES
OF REAL PROPERTY OR FIXTURES

Section

506-1 Lien of mortgages of real property or
fixtures;

debts secured; priority

506-2 On what property; enforceability

506-3 After-acquired real property and fixtures

506-4 Interests in recorded mortgages and leases

506-5 Use and possession of mortgaged property

506-6 Registered land

506-7 Mortgages on real property, damage or

destruction of collateral

506-8 Release of mortgages of real property or fixtures

506-9 Mortgage insurance; notice of right to
cancel

506-10 Reverse mortgage loan

Cross References

Civil relief for state military forces, see chapter 657D.

Mortgage rescue fraud prevention act, see chapter 480E.

Secure and fair enforcement for mortgage licensing act, see
chapter 454F.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next